Hawaii statutes.
[§321-314] Reports to the department.
Any health care professional who has the primary responsibility for the
treatment of an individual who is suffering from environmentally-related
illness or injury shall report the occurrence or suspected occurrence of such
illness or injury to the department in writing or in the manner specified by
the director of health. Every laboratory director having laboratory data
regarding an individual affected by or suspected to be affected by a toxic
substance determined by the director of health to present a threat to public
health shall report such data to the department of health in a manner specified
by the director. Forms for the reporting of environmentally-related illness or
injury shall be provided by the department. [L 1987, c 186, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next